Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1708
Construction commencement date.

Construction of a solid waste disposal area or solid waste processing facility which is granted siting approval pursuant to sections 13-1701 to 13-1714 and 76-2,119 shall commence within two calendar years from the date approval was granted, or the approval shall be nullified. If the siting decision is appealed, the two-year period shall begin on the date upon which the appeal process is concluded.

Laws 1991, LB 813, § 8.